src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-norm.yaml
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoonyiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonyiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonyiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoonyiwaadigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonyiwaadiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonyiwaadigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoonsinaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonsinaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonsinaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoonsinaanidigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonsinaanidiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonsinaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoonsiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonsiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonsiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoonsiwaadigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonsiwaadiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonsiwaadigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: ogookookohoonyiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonyiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonyiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoonyiniidigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonyiniidiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonyiniidigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+4: ogookookohoonyiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonyiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonyiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoonyiwaadigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonyiwaadiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonyiwaadigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: ogookookohoonsiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonsiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonsiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoonsiniidigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonsiniidiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonsiniidigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: ogookookohoonsiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonsiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonsiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoonsiwaadigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonsiwaadiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonsiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nigookookohoomishinaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoomishinaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoomishinaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoomishinaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoomishiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoomishiwaadig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: ogookookohoomishiniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoomishiniidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: ogookookohoomishiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoomishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nigookookohoomishinaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoomishinaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoomishinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gigookookohoomishinaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoomishinaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoomishinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gigookookohoomishiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoomishiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoomishiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: ogookookohoomishiniwa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: ogookookohoomishiniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: ogookookohoomishiniwa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: ogookookohoomishiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoomishiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoomishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nigookookohoomishibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nigookookohoomishibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nigookookohoomishibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gigookookohoomishibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoomishibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoomishibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: ogookookohoomishibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoomishibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoomishibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: igookookohoomishibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: igookookohoomishibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: igookookohoomishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nigookookohoominaanibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nigookookohoominaanibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nigookookohoominaanibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nigookookohoominaanidigan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoominaanidiging
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoominaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoominaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoominaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoominaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoominaanidigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoominaanidiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoominaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoomiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoomiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoomiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoomiwaadigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoomiwaadiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoomiwaadigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt+4: ogookookohoominiibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoominiibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoominiibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoominiidigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoominiidiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoominiidigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: ogookookohoomiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoomiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoomiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoomiwaadigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoomiwaadiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoomiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nigookookohooshinaanibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nigookookohooshinaanibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nigookookohooshinaanibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nigookookohooshinaanidigan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nigookookohooshinaanidiging
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nigookookohooshinaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohooshinaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohooshinaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohooshinaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohooshinaanidigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohooshinaanidiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohooshinaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohooshiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohooshiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohooshiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohooshiwaadigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohooshiwaadiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohooshiwaadigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: ogookookohooshiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: ogookookohooshiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: ogookookohooshiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohooshiniidigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohooshiniidiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohooshiniidigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: ogookookohooshiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ogookookohooshiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ogookookohooshiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohooshiwaadigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohooshiwaadiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohooshiwaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nigookookohoonyimishinaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishinaanidig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nigookookohoonsimishinaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishinaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoonyimishinaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishinaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoonyimishiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishiwaadig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoonsimishinaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishinaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoonsimishiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishiwaadig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: ogookookohoonyimishiniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiniidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: ogookookohoonyimishiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiwaadig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: ogookookohoonsimishiniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiniidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: ogookookohoonsimishiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nigookookohoonyimishinaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoonyimishinaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishinaanig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nigookookohoonsimishinaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoonsimishinaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gigookookohoonyimishinaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishinaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gigookookohoonyimishiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishiwaag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gigookookohoonsimishinaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonsimishinaaning
